test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-caskes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - čaˊskes: # 2A v > kk, e > a, ? > ?
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Nom: čaˊskes
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Gen: časkas
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Acc: časkas
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Ill: časkasân
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Loc: časkasist
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Com: časkasáin
    čaˊskes+N+Sg+Abe: časkasttáá
    čaˊskes+N+Ess: [časkasin, čaˊskesin]
    čaˊskes+N+Par: [časkasid, čaˊskesid]
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Nom: časkaseh
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Gen: časkasij
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Acc: časkasijd
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Ill: časkasáid
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Loc: časkasijn
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Com: časkasijguin
    čaˊskes+N+Pl+Abe: časkasijttáá
